lt-LT: Skirstomojo veleno medžiaga: Plieno ruošinys; Ketus; Kietintasis ketus; Kalusis ketus; Kaltinis plienas; Plienas; Įrankinis plienas; Kita
ja: カムシャフト素材: ビレットスチール; 鋳鉄; チルド鋳鉄; ダクタイル鋳鉄; 鍛造スチール; スチール; 工具鋼; その他
bg-BG: Материал на разпределителния вал: Фрезована стомана; Чугун; Избелен чугун; Сферографитен чугун; Кована стомана; Стомана; Инструментална стомана; Други
sk-SK: Materiál vačkového hriadeľa: Obrábaná oceľ; Liatina; Tvrdená liatina; Tvárna liatina; Kovaná oceľ; Oceľ; Nástrojová oceľ; Iné
ru: Материал распределительного вала: Цельнофрезерованная сталь; Чугун; Отбеленный чугун; Ковкий чугун; Кованая сталь; Сталь; Инструментальная сталь; Другое
sl-SI: Material odmične gredi: Gredično jeklo; Lito železo; Kaljeno lito železo; Nodularna litina; Kovano jeklo; Jeklo; Orodno jeklo; Drugo
sv: Kamaxelns material: Billetstål; Gjutjärn; Kokillgjutjärn; Segjärn; Smidesstål; Stål; Verktygsstål; Övrigt
ro-RO: Materialul arborelui cu came: Oțel frezat; Fontă; Fontă durificată; Fontă ductilă; Oțel forjat; Oțel; Oțel de scule; Altele
de: Material der Nockenwelle: Billet-Stahl; Gusseisen; Schalenhartguss; Sphäroguss; Geschmiedeter Stahl; Stahl; Werkzeugstahl; Sonstige
ko: 캠축 재질: 빌릿강; 주철; 칠드 주철; 연성 주철; 단조강; 강철; 공구강; 기타
hu: Vezérműtengely anyaga: Forgácsolt acél; Öntöttvas; Kéregöntöttvas; Gömbgrafitos öntöttvas; Kovácsolt acél; Acél; Szerszámacél; Egyéb
pl: Materiał wałka rozrządu: Stal frezowana (billet); Żeliwo; Żeliwo utwardzane; Żeliwo sferoidalne; Stal kuta; Stal; Stal narzędziowa; Inne
pt-PT: Material da árvore de cames: Aço billet; Ferro fundido; Ferro fundido coquilhado; Ferro dúctil; Aço forjado; Aço; Aço para ferramentas; Outro
fi: Nokka-akselin materiaali: Billet-teräs; Valurauta; Kokillivalurauta; Pallografiittivalurauta; Taottu teräs; Teräs; Työkaluteräs; Muu
cs: Materiál vačkového hřídele: Frézovaná ocel; Litina; Tvrzená litina; Tvárná litina; Kovaná ocel; Ocel; Nástrojová ocel; Jiný
da: Knastakselmateriale: Fræset stål; Støbejern; Hårdstøbt jern; Sejgjern; Smedet stål; Stål; Værktøjsstål; Andet
pt-BR: Material do eixo de comando: Aço billet; Ferro fundido; Ferro fundido resfriado; Ferro fundido dúctil; Aço forjado; Aço; Aço ferramenta; Outro
en: Camshaft material: Billet steel; Cast iron; Chilled cast iron; Ductile iron; Forged steel; Steel; Tool steel; Other
vi: Vật liệu trục cam: Phôi thép đúc; Gang; Gang biến trắng; Gang dẻo; Thép rèn; Thép; Thép công cụ; Khác
el: Υλικό εκκεντροφόρου άξονα: Billet (μασίφ) ατσάλι; Χυτοσίδηρος; Σκληρυμένος χυτοσίδηρος; Όλκιμος σίδηρος; Σφυρήλατο ατσάλι; Ατσάλι; Εργαλειοχάλυβας; Άλλο
fr: Matériau de l’arbre à cames: Acier taillé dans la masse; Fonte; Fonte trempée; Fonte ductile; Acier forgé; Acier; Acier à outils; Autre
es: Material del árbol de levas: Acero de palanquilla; Hierro fundido; Hierro fundido templado; Hierro dúctil; Acero forjado; Acero; Acero para herramientas; Otro
it: materiale dell'albero a camme: Acciaio ricavato dal pieno; Ghisa; Ghisa temprata; Ghisa duttile; Acciaio forgiato; Acciaio; Acciaio per utensili; Altro
zh-CN: 凸轮轴材质: 钢坯; 铸铁; 冷硬铸铁; 球墨铸铁; 锻钢; 钢; 工具钢; 其他
zh-TW: 凸輪軸材質: 鋼胚; 鑄鐵; 冷硬鑄鐵; 球墨鑄鐵; 鍛造鋼; 鋼; 工具鋼; 其他
nb: Kamakselmateriale: Billet-stål; Støpejern; Herdet støpejern; Seigjern; Smidd stål; Stål; Verktøystål; Annet
tr: Eksantrik mili malzemesi: Kütük çelik; Dökme demir; Soğutulmuş dökme demir; Sfero döküm; Dövme çelik; Çelik; Takım çeliği; Diğer
hr-HR: Materijal bregastog vratila: Čelik iz bloka; Lijevano željezo; Tvrdo lijevano željezo; Nodularni lijev; Kovani čelik; Čelik; Alatni čelik; Ostalo
nl: Nokkenas materiaal: Billet staal; Gietijzer; Gehard gietijzer; Nodulair gietijzer; Gesmeed staal; Staal; Gereedschapsstaal; Overig
th: วัสดุที่ใช้ทำเพลาลูกเบี้ยว: เหล็กบิลเล็ต; เหล็กหล่อ; เหล็กหล่อเย็น; เหล็กเหนียว; เหล็กฟอร์จ; เหล็ก; เหล็กเครื่องมือ; อื่นๆ